Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2306
Qualification for benefit; how treated.

A finding that
a student qualifies for an education benefit pursuant to the In the Line of Duty
Dependent Education Act shall not be admissible as evidence for any other
purpose.

Laws 2009, LB206, § 6.